New York, session 2025-2026, S8963.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 3502 of the public health law, as 2 added by chapter 313 of the laws of 2018, subparagraph (i) of paragraph 3 (a) as amended by chapter 486 of the laws of 2022 and subparagraphs (ii) 4 and (iii) of paragraph (a), paragraph (b), subparagraphs (i), (ii), 5 (iii) and (v) of paragraph (c), paragraph (e) and the opening paragraph 6 and subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of paragraph (f) as amended by section 1 7 of part LL of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 6. (a) (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other 10 provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, licensed practi- 11 tioners, persons licensed under this article and unlicensed personnel 12 employed at a local correctional facility, or secure or specialized 13 secure detention facility may, in a manner permitted by the regulations 14 promulgated pursuant to this subdivision, utilize body imaging scanning 15 equipment that applies ionizing radiation to humans for purposes of 16 screening incarcerated individuals committed to such local correctional 17 facility, or individuals detained in, committed to, visiting or employed 18 in a secure or specialized secure detention facility, in connection with 19 the implementation of such facility's security program. 20 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other 21 provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, licensed practi- 22 tioners, persons licensed under this article and unlicensed personnel 23 employed at a state correctional facility or facility for youth placed 24 with or committed to the office of children and family services may, in 25 a manner permitted by the regulations promulgated pursuant to this 26 subdivision, utilize body imaging scanning equipment that applies ioniz- 27 ing radiation to humans for purposes of screening individuals detained EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14112-01-5 S. 8963 2 1 in, committed to, visiting, or employed in such facility, in connection 2 with the implementation of such facility's security program. 3 (iii) The utilization of such body imaging scanning equipment shall be 4 in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department, or for 5 local correctional facilities in cities having a population of two 6 million or more, such utilization shall be in accordance with regu- 7 lations promulgated by the New York city department of health and mental 8 hygiene. The state commission of correction, in consultation with the 9 department of corrections and community supervision and the office of 10 children and family services, shall promulgate regulations establishing 11 when body imaging scanning equipment will be used to screen visitors and 12 [incarcerated] individuals detained in or committed to state correction- 13 al facilities, secure or specialized secure detention facilities, or 14 facilities for youth placed with or committed to the office of children 15 and family services. Such regulations shall include provisions estab- 16 lishing that alternative methods of screening may be used to accommodate 17 individuals who decline or are unable to be screened by body imaging 18 scanning equipment for medical reasons and that alternative methods of 19 screening may be used to accommodate individuals who decline to be 20 screened for other reasons, unless security considerations warrant 21 otherwise. Such regulations shall also ensure that no person shall be 22 subjected to any form of harassment, intimidation, or disciplinary 23 action for choosing to be searched by an alternative method of screening 24 in lieu of body imaging scanning. 25 The department of corrections and community supervision and the office 26 of children and family services shall promulgate regulations establish- 27 ing when body imaging scanning equipment will be used to screen employ- 28 ees of the department of corrections and community supervision and the 29 office of children and family services, provided, however that such 30 regulations shall be consistent with the policies and procedures of the 31 department of corrections and community supervision and the office of 32 children and family services governing the search of employees. Such 33 regulations shall include provisions establishing that alternative meth- 34 ods of screening may be used to accommodate individuals who decline or 35 are unable to be screened by body imaging scanning equipment for medical 36 or other reasons. Such regulations shall also ensure that no person 37 shall be subjected to any form of harassment, intimidation, or discipli- 38 nary action for choosing to be searched by an alternative method of 39 screening in lieu of body imaging scanning. An employee's request to be 40 searched by an alternative method of screening in lieu of body imaging 41 scanning shall not, in itself, be grounds for disciplinary action 42 against such employee. 43 (b) Prior to establishing, maintaining or operating any body imaging 44 scanning equipment in a state or local correctional facility, [any body 45 imaging scanning equipment] secure or specialized secure detention 46 facility, or facility for youth placed with or committed to the office 47 of children and family services, the chief administrative officer of the 48 facility shall ensure that such facility is in compliance with the regu- 49 lations promulgated pursuant to this subdivision and otherwise applica- 50 ble requirements for the installation, registration, maintenance, opera- 51 tion and inspection of body imaging scanning equipment. 52 (c) The regulations promulgated pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of para- 53 graph (a) of this subdivision shall include, but not be limited to: 54 (i) A requirement that prior to operating body imaging scanning equip- 55 ment, unlicensed personnel employed at state or local correctional 56 facilities, secure or specialized secure detention facilities, or facil- S. 8963 3 1 ities for youth placed with or committed to the office of children and 2 family services shall have successfully completed a training course 3 approved by the department, or for local correctional facilities in 4 cities of two million or more, approved by the New York city department 5 of health and mental hygiene, and that such personnel receive additional 6 training on an annual basis; 7 (ii) Limitations on exposure which shall be no more than fifty percent 8 of the annual exposure limits for non-radiation workers as specified by 9 applicable regulations, except that individuals under the age of eigh- 10 teen shall not be subject to more than five percent of such annual expo- 11 sure limits, and pregnant women shall not be subject to such scanning at 12 any time. Procedures for identifying pregnant women shall be set forth 13 in the regulations; 14 (iii) Registration with the department of each body imaging scanning 15 machine purchased or installed at a state or local correctional 16 facility, secure or specialized secure detention facility, or facility 17 for youth placed with or committed to the office of children and family 18 services; 19 (iv) Inspection and regular reviews of the use of body imaging scan- 20 ning equipment by the department or the New York city department of 21 health and mental hygiene, as applicable; and 22 (v) A requirement that records be kept regarding each use of body 23 imaging scanning equipment by the state or local correctional facility, 24 secure or specialized secure detention facility, or facility for youth 25 placed with or committed to the office of children and family services. 26 (d) For the purpose of this subdivision, "body imaging scanning equip- 27 ment" or "equipment" means equipment that utilizes a low dose of ioniz- 28 ing radiation to produce an anatomical image capable of detecting 29 objects placed on, attached to or secreted within a person's body. 30 (e) For the purposes of this subdivision: 31 (i) "Local correctional facility" shall have the same meaning as found 32 in subdivision sixteen of section two of the correction law. 33 (ii) "State correctional facility" shall mean a "correctional facili- 34 ty" as defined in subdivision four of section two of the correction law. 35 (iii) "Secure detention facility" shall mean a secure detention facil- 36 ity certified by the office of children and family services pursuant to 37 section five hundred three of the executive law. 38 (iv) "Specialized secure detention facility" shall mean a facility for 39 adolescent offenders certified by the office of children and family 40 services in consultation with the state commission of correction pursu- 41 ant to subdivision nine of section five hundred three of the executive 42 law. 43 (v) "Facility for youth placed with or committed to the office of 44 children and family services" shall mean a facility operated pursuant to 45 section five hundred four of the executive law. 46 (f) Any local government agency that utilizes body imaging scanning 47 equipment in a local correctional, or secure or specialized secure 48 detention facility under its jurisdiction shall submit an annual report 49 to the department, the speaker of the assembly, and the temporary presi- 50 dent of the senate. If body imaging scanning equipment is utilized in 51 one or more state correctional facilities or facilities for youth placed 52 with or committed to the office of children and family services, the 53 department of corrections and community supervision or the office of 54 children and family services, as applicable, shall submit an annual 55 report to the department, the speaker of the assembly, and the temporary 56 president of the senate. Such report by [either] the local government S. 8963 4 1 agency [or], the department of corrections and community supervision or 2 the office of children and family services shall be submitted within 3 eighteen months after the initial date of registration of such equipment 4 with the department, and annually thereafter, and shall contain the 5 following information as to each such facility: 6 (i) [For] for local correctional facilities, the number of times the 7 equipment was used on incarcerated individuals, or for secure or 8 specialized secure detention facilities, the number of times the equip- 9 ment was used on individuals placed with, committed to, visiting or 10 employed in such facility, upon intake, after visits, and upon the 11 suspicion of contraband, as well as any other event that triggers the 12 use of such equipment, and the average, median, and highest number of 13 times the equipment was used on any [incarcerated] such individual, with 14 corresponding exposure levels; [and] 15 (ii) [For] for state correctional facilities or facilities for youth 16 placed with or committed to the office of children and family services, 17 the number of times the equipment was used on individuals detained in, 18 committed to, working in, or visiting the facility upon intake, before 19 work shift, after work shift, before visits, after visits, and upon the 20 suspicion of contraband, as well as any other event that triggers the 21 use of such equipment, and the average, median, and highest number of 22 times the equipment was used on any individual detained in, committed 23 to, working in, or visiting the facility, with corresponding exposure 24 levels[.]; 25 (iii) the number of times the use of the equipment detected the pres- 26 ence of drug contraband, weapon contraband, and any other illegal or 27 impermissible object or substance; 28 (iv) incidents or any injuries or illness resulting from the use of 29 such equipment or reported by persons scanned by such equipment; and 30 (v) any other information the department may reasonably require. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 32 it shall have become a law; provided, however that the amendments to 33 subdivision 6 of section 3502 of the public health law made by section 34 one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such subdivision and 35 shall be deemed repealed therewith. Effective immediately, the addition, 36 amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the 37 implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be 38 made and completed on or before such effective date.